Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2511
Occupational therapy aide, defined.

Occupational therapy aide means a person who is not licensed by the board and who provides supportive services to occupational therapists and occupational therapy assistants and functions only under the guidance, responsibility, and supervision of an occupational therapist or an occupational therapy assistant. An aide shall not provide occupational therapy services and shall demonstrate competence before performing assigned and delegated client-related and non-client-related tasks. An aide includes a rehabilitation aide, a rehabilitation technician, and other designations of nonlicensed, supportive personnel.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 851;

Laws 2025, LB257, § 8.